Florida, session 2026, SB1350.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 55 56 Section 1.âPresent paragraphs (n) and (o) of subsection (3) 57 of section 196.1978, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as 58 paragraphs (p) and (q), respectively, new paragraphs (n) and (o) 59 are added to that subsection, and paragraphs (a), (b), (d), (e), 60 (f), and (l) and present paragraph (o) of that subsection are 61 amended, to read: 62 196.1978âAffordable housing property exemption.â 63 (3)(a)âAs used in this subsection, the term: 64 1.ââCorporationâ means the Florida Housing Finance 65 Corporation. 66 2.ââLURAâ means a land use restriction agreement with a 67 term of not less than 3 years, recorded in the official records 68 of the county in which the property is located, which requires 69 that the property be used to provide housing to natural persons 70 or families meeting the definition of extremely-low-income, 71 very-low-income, low-income, or moderate-income persons as 72 provided in s. 420.0004. 73 3.ââNewly constructedâ means an improvement to real 74 property which was substantially completed within 2 5 years 75 before the date of an applicantâs first submission of a request 76 for a certification notice pursuant to this subsection. 77 4.3.ââSubstantially completedâ has the same meaning as in 78 s. 192.042(1). 79 (b)âNotwithstanding ss. 196.195 and 196.196, portions of 80 property in a multifamily project are considered property used 81 for a charitable purpose and are eligible to receive an ad 82 valorem property tax exemption if such portions meet all of the 83 following conditions: 84 1.âProvide affordable housing to natural persons or 85 families meeting the income limitations provided in paragraph 86 (d). 87 2.a.âAre within a newly constructed multifamily project 88 that contains more than 50 70 units dedicated to housing natural 89 persons or families meeting the income limitations provided in 90 paragraph (d); or 91 b.âAre within a newly constructed multifamily project in an 92 area of critical state concern, as designated by s. 380.0552 or 93 chapter 28-36, Florida Administrative Code, which contains more 94 than 10 units dedicated to housing natural persons or families 95 meeting the income limitations provided in paragraph (d). 96 3.âAre rented for an amount that does not exceed the amount 97 as specified by the most recent multifamily rental programs 98 income and rent limit chart posted by the corporation and 99 derived from the Multifamily Tax Subsidy Projects Income Limits 100 published by the United States Department of Housing and Urban 101 Development or 90 percent of the fair market value rent as 102 determined by a rental market study meeting the requirements of 103 paragraph (l), whichever is less. 104 (d)1.âThe property appraiser shall exempt units in 105 multifamily projects, as follows: 106 a.âSeventy-five percent of the assessed value of the units 107 in multifamily projects that: 108 (I)âMeet the requirements of this subsection and are used 109 to house natural persons or families whose annual household 110 income is greater than 80 percent but not more than 120 percent 111 of the median annual adjusted gross income for households within 112 the metropolitan statistical area or, if not within a 113 metropolitan statistical area, within the county in which the 114 person or family resides; or 115 (II)âFor the first taxable year after the property obtains 116 a certificate of occupancy, are subject to a LURA and are 117 dedicated to housing natural persons or families whose annual 118 household income is greater than 80 percent but not more than 119 120 percent of the median annual adjusted gross income for 120 households within the metropolitan statistical area or, if not 121 within a metropolitan statistical area, within the county in 122 which the person or family resides. and 123 b.âFrom ad valorem property taxes, the units in multifamily 124 projects that: 125 (I)âMeet the requirements of this subsection and are used 126 to house natural persons or families whose annual household 127 income does not exceed 80 percent of the median annual adjusted 128 gross income for households within the metropolitan statistical 129 area or, if not within a metropolitan statistical area, within 130 the county in which the person or family resides; or 131 (II)âFor the first taxable year after the property obtains 132 a certificate of occupancy, are subject to a LURA and dedicated 133 to housing natural persons or families whose annual household 134 income does not exceed 80 percent of the median annual adjusted 135 gross income for households within the metropolitan statistical 136 area or, if not within a metropolitan statistical area, within 137 the county in which the person or family resides. 138 2.âWhen determining the value of a unit for purposes of 139 applying an exemption pursuant to this paragraph, the property 140 appraiser must include in such valuation the proportionate share 141 of the residential common areas, including the land, fairly 142 attributable to such unit. 143 (e)1.âTo be eligible to receive an exemption under this 144 subsection, a property owner must submit an application on a 145 form prescribed by the department by March 1 for the exemption, 146 accompanied by a certification notice from the corporation to 147 the property appraiser. The property appraiser shall review the 148 application and determine whether the applicant meets all of the 149 requirements of this subsection and is entitled to an exemption. 150 A property appraiser may request and review additional 151 information necessary to make such determination. A property 152 appraiser may grant an exemption only for a property for which 153 the corporation has issued a certification notice and which the 154 property appraiser determines is entitled to an exemption. 155 2.âFor portions of property subject to a LURA and used to 156 house natural persons or families meeting the income limits 157 specified in paragraph (d) and rented for an amount meeting the 158 limits specified in subparagraph (b)3., an annual compliance 159 report and statement from the corporation meeting the 160 requirements of this subparagraph are presumptive evidence that 161 such portions of property meet the income limits of paragraph 162 (d) and the rent limits of subparagraph (b)3. The annual 163 compliance report may be produced by a county, municipality, or 164 other entity approved by the corporation to produce reports for 165 the purpose of determining compliance with LURAs for affordable 166 multifamily rental housing developments. The corporation shall 167 review and approve such annual compliance reports. A property 168 owner seeking an exemption pursuant to this subsection must 169 receive a statement from the corporation upon approval of the 170 compliance report specifying the number of units on January 1 171 that were used to house natural persons or families meeting the 172 income limits of sub-subparagraph (d)1.a. or sub-subparagraph 173 (d)1.b. and complying with the rent limits of subparagraph (b)3. 174 (f)1.âTo receive a certification notice, a property owner 175 must submit a request to the corporation on a form provided by 176 the corporation which includes all of the following: 177 a.1.âThe most recently completed rental market study 178 meeting the requirements of paragraph (l). 179 b.2.âA list of the units for which the property owner seeks 180 an exemption. 181 c.3.âThe rent amount received by the property owner for 182 each unit for which the property owner seeks an exemption. If a 183 unit is vacant and qualifies for an exemption under paragraph 184 (c), the property owner must provide evidence of the published 185 rent amount for each vacant unit. 186 d.4.âA sworn statement, under penalty of perjury, from the 187 applicant restricting the property for a period of not less than 188 3 years to housing persons or families who meet the income 189 limitations under this subsection. 190 2.a.âPortions of property that are subject to a LURA and 191 are specified in the LURA as dedicated to providing housing to 192 natural persons or families meeting the income limits specified 193 in paragraph (d) and to being rented for an amount meeting the 194 limits specified in subparagraph (b)3., are presumed eligible 195 for a certification notice for the term of the agreement upon 196 submission of such agreement to the corporation with the request 197 for certification. 198 b.âFor the first request for a certification notice after 199 receiving a certificate of occupancy, an owner of portions of 200 property meeting the requirements of sub-subparagraph a. may 201 submit a request to the corporation for a certification notice 202 immediately after the date on which the property obtains a 203 certificate of occupancy and is placed in service. In the 204 request for a certification notice pursuant to this sub 205 subparagraph, the owner of the property may specify the rent 206 amount that will be charged upon occupancy for each unit 207 dedicated to housing natural persons or families meeting the 208 income limits specified in paragraph (d) instead of the 209 information required by sub-subparagraph 1.c. 210 c.âThe owner of portions of property meeting the 211 requirements of sub-subparagraph a. may submit a LURA with the 212 request for a certification notice instead of the information 213 required by sub-subparagraph 1.d. 214 (l)âA rental market study submitted as required by sub 215 subparagraph (f)1.a. subparagraph (f)1. must identify the fair 216 market value rent of each unit for which a property owner seeks 217 an exemption. Only a certified general appraiser as defined in 218 s. 475.611 may issue a rental market study. The certified 219 general appraiser must be independent of the property owner who 220 requests the rental market study. In preparing the rental market 221 study, a certified general appraiser shall comply with the 222 standards of professional practice pursuant to part II of 223 chapter 475 and use comparable property within the same 224 geographic area and of the same type as the property for which 225 the exemption is sought. A rental market study must have been 226 completed within 3 years before submission of the application. 227 (n)âUpon the request of a property owner, the property 228 appraiser must issue a letter to verify that a multifamily 229 project, if constructed and leased as described in the site 230 plan, qualifies for the exemption under this subsection. To 231 qualify, the site plan must specify requirements for use of the 232 property which match the requirements for the exemption under 233 this subsection, including the number of units dedicated to 234 housing natural persons and families meeting the income limits 235 of subparagraph (d) and the rent amounts that will be charged 236 upon occupancy for such units. Within 30 days after receipt of 237 the request described in this paragraph, the property appraiser 238 shall issue a verification letter or provide the reasons the 239 project is ineligible for the exemption. A project that has 240 received a verification letter before the adoption of the 241 ordinance described in paragraph (q) is exempt from the 242 ordinance. 243 (o)âProperty in a multifamily project which received an 244 exemption pursuant to subparagraph (d)1. is eligible to receive 245 such exemption for each subsequent consecutive year that the 246 property meets the criteria of paragraph (b) and the successive 247 owner applies for and receives the exemption. 248 (q)1.(o)1.âBeginning with the 2025 tax roll, a taxing 249 authority may elect, upon adoption of an ordinance or resolution 250 approved by a two-thirds vote of the governing body, not to 251 exempt property under sub-subparagraph (d)1.a. located in a 252 county specified pursuant to subparagraph 2., subject to the 253 conditions of this paragraph. 254 2.âA taxing authority must make a finding in the ordinance 255 or resolution that annual housing reports the most recently 256 published by the Shimberg Center for Housing Studies Annual 257 Report, prepared pursuant to s. 420.6075 identify, identifies 258 that a county that is part of the jurisdiction of the taxing 259 authority is within a metropolitan statistical area or region 260 where, for each of the previous 3 years, the number of 261 affordable and available units in the metropolitan statistical 262 area or region is greater than the number of renter households 263 in the metropolitan statistical area or region for the category 264 entitled â0-120 percent AMI.â 265 3.âAn election made pursuant to this paragraph may apply 266 only to the ad valorem property tax levies imposed within a 267 county specified pursuant to subparagraph 2. by the taxing 268 authority making the election. 269 4.âThe ordinance or resolution must take effect on the 270 January 1 immediately succeeding adoption and shall expire on 271 the following second January 1 after the January 1 in which the 272 ordinance or resolution takes effect. The ordinance or 273 resolution may be renewed before prior to its expiration 274 pursuant to this paragraph if the taxing authority makes the 275 same finding required in subparagraph 2. 276 5.âThe taxing authority proposing to make an election under 277 this paragraph must advertise the ordinance or resolution or 278 renewal thereof pursuant to the requirements of s. 50.011(1) 279 prior to adoption. 280 6.âThe taxing authority must provide to the property 281 appraiser the adopted ordinance or resolution or renewal thereof 282 by the effective date of the ordinance or resolution or renewal 283 thereof. 284 7.âNotwithstanding an ordinance or resolution or renewal 285 thereof adopted pursuant to this paragraph:, 286 a.âProperty in a multifamily project that received an 287 exemption pursuant to sub-subparagraph (d)1.a. before the 288 adoption or renewal of such ordinance or resolution may continue 289 to receive such exemption for each subsequent consecutive year 290 that the same owner or each successive owner applies for and is 291 granted the exemption. 292 b.âProperty in a multifamily project for which the first 293 certification notice request was submitted before adoption or 294 renewal of such ordinance or resolution, and which would have 295 otherwise received the exemption if such ordinance or resolution 296 had not been adopted or renewed, may receive the exemption for 297 the year the owner applies for and is granted the exemption, and 298 for each subsequent consecutive year that the same owner or each 299 successive owner applies for and is granted the exemption. 300 Section 2.â(1)âThe Department of Revenue is authorized, 301 and all conditions are deemed met, to adopt emergency rules 302 under s. 120.54(4), Florida Statutes, for the purpose of 303 implementing the amendments to s. 196.1978, Florida Statutes, 304 made by this act. Notwithstanding any other law, emergency rules 305 adopted under this section are effective for 6 months after 306 adoption, and may be renewed during the pendency of procedures 307 to adopt permanent rules addressing the subject of the emergency 308 rules. 309 (2)âThis section expires July 1, 2028. 310 Section 3.âThe amendments made by this act to s. 196.1978, 311 Florida Statutes, first apply to the 2027 tax roll. 312 Section 4.âSubsection (2) of section 420.6075, Florida 313 Statutes, is amended to read: 314 420.6075âResearch and planning for affordable housing; 315 annual housing report.â 316 (2)âBy September 30 December 31 of each year, the Shimberg 317 Center for Housing Studies shall submit to the Legislature an 318 updated housing report describing the supply of and need for 319 affordable housing. This annual housing report must shall 320 include: 321 (a)âA synopsis of training and technical assistance 322 activities and community-based organization housing activities 323 for the year. 324 (b)âA status report on the degree of progress toward 325 meeting the housing objectives of the departmentâs agency 326 functional plan. 327 (c)âRecommended housing initiatives for the next fiscal 328 year and recommended priorities for assistance to the various 329 target populations within the spectrum of housing need. 330 Section 5.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.